Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-106
Domestic company; books and records required.

The Department of Insurance shall require every domestic insurance company to keep its books, records, accounts and vouchers in such manner that it may readily verify its annual statement, and ascertain whether the company is solvent and has complied with the law.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 8, p. 398;

R.S.1913, § 3144;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.1922, § 7745;

C.S.1929, § 44-201;

R.S.1943, § 44-106.